Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.046

Temporary cease and desist order—Injunction against order on application of association—Jurisdiction.

Within ten days after an association has been served with a temporary cease and desist order, the association may apply to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order pending the completion of the administrative proceedings pursuant to the notice served under RCW 33.04.044.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

[ 1982 c 3 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.